Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-705
Court of condemnation; appeal; judgment; bonds.

Upon the hearing of an appeal in the district court pursuant to section 19-704, judgment shall be pronounced, as in ordinary cases, for the value of such works, plant, or system. The city, village, party, or corporation owning such plant, works, or system may appeal to the Court of Appeals. Upon a final judgment being pronounced as to the value of such plant, works, or system, the city council of such city or village board of trustees of such village shall issue and sell bonds of the city or village to pay the amount of such value and judgment without a vote of the people.

Laws 1919, c. 188, § 5, p. 426;

C.S.1922, § 4604;

C.S.1929, § 19-705;

Laws 1941, c. 26, § 5, p. 125;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 19-712;

R.S.1943, § 19-705;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 22;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 61.